New Jersey, session 221, A1291.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities and the Department of Environmental Protection, shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations permitting a public utility, cable television company, or telecommunications service provider to operate an unmanned aircraft system in this State to assess, inspect, operate, or otherwise maintain any critical infrastructure owned or operated by the public utility, cable television company, or telecommunications service provider within this State, provided that the public utility, cable television company, or telecommunications service provider shall operate the unmanned aircraft system in a manner consistent with applicable federal law and regulations. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any federal preemption of State law governing aviation. b.   A public utility, cable television company, or telecommunications service provider may contract with a third party to operate unmanned aircraft systems, pursuant to any applicable regulations adopted by the Federal Aviation Administration and any applicable regulations adopted by the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness pursuant to this section, to conduct the inspections described in subsection a. of this section. c.   For the purposes of this section: Cable television company shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-3). Critical infrastructure means the physical systems and assets of a public utility, cable television company, or telecommunications service provider that are so vital to the State that the full or partial incapacity or destruction of these systems and assets would have a debilitating impact on the States security, economy, public health, public safety, or any combination thereof. Operate shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.2017, c.315 (C.2C:40-27). Public utility shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.48:2-13, and shall include dams subject to the provisions of the Safe Dam Act, P.L.1981, c.249 (C.58:4-8.1 et al.). Telecommunications service provider means an entity that does business in this State and that offers telecommunications service, including, but not limited, to Internet service, directly to the public, or to classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the public, whether wireless or wireline, and regardless of whether a fee is charged for the use of the service. Unmanned aircraft shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.2017, c.315 (C.2C:40-27). Unmanned aircraft system shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.2017, c.315 (C.2C:40-27). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.